Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 8001.
Renewable energy goals.

The General Assembly finds it in the interest of the people of the State to promote the State energy policy established in section 202a of this title by:

Balancing the benefits, lifetime costs, and rates of the State’s overall energy portfolio to ensure that to the greatest extent possible the economic benefits of renewable energy in the State flow to the Vermont economy in general, and to the rate-paying citizens of the State in particular.

Supporting development of renewable energy that uses natural resources efficiently and related planned energy industries in Vermont, and the jobs and economic benefits associated with such development, while retaining and supporting existing renewable energy infrastructure.

Providing an incentive for the State’s retail electricity providers to enter into affordable, long-term, stably priced renewable energy contracts that mitigate market price fluctuation for Vermonters.

Developing viable markets for renewable energy and energy efficiency projects.

Protecting and promoting air and water quality in the State and region through the displacement of those fuels, including fossil fuels, which are known to emit or discharge pollutants.

Contributing to reductions in global climate change and anticipating the impacts on the State’s economy that might be caused by federal regulation designed to attain those reductions.

Providing support and incentives to locate renewable energy plants of small and moderate size in a manner that is distributed across the State’s electric grid, including locating such plants in areas that will provide benefit to the operation and management of that grid through such means as reducing line losses and addressing transmission and distribution constraints.

Promoting the inclusion, in Vermont’s electric supply portfolio, of renewable energy plants that are diverse in plant capacity and type of renewable energy technology.

The Commission shall adopt the rules that are necessary to allow the Commission and the Department to implement and supervise programs pursuant to subchapter 1 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 69

, § 1, eff. June 17, 2003; amended

2005, No. 61

, § 1;

2011, No. 47

, § 6 (eff. May 25, 2011) and § 18;

2011, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 18, 2012;

2015, No. 56

, § 21.

§ 8002.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Commission” means the Public Utility Commission under section 3 of this title.

“Commissioned” or “commissioning” means the first time a plant is put into operation following initial construction or modernization if the costs of modernization are at least 50 percent of the costs that would be required to build a new plant including all buildings and structures technically required for the new plant’s operation. However, these terms shall not include activities necessary to establish operational readiness of a plant.

“CPI” means the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers, designated as “CPI-U,” in the northeast region, as published by the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

“Customer” means a retail electric consumer.

“Department” means the Department of Public Service under section 1 of this title, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

“Energy conversion efficiency” means the effective use of energy and heat from a combustion process.

“Environmental attributes” means the characteristics of a plant that enable the energy it produces to qualify as renewable energy and include any and all benefits of the plant to the environment such as avoided emissions or other impacts to air, water, or soil that may occur through the plant’s displacement of a nonrenewable energy source.

“Existing renewable energy” means renewable energy produced by a plant that came into service prior to or on June 30, 2015.

“Greenhouse gas reduction credits” shall be as defined in section 8006a of this title.

“Group net metering system” means a net metering system serving more than one customer, or a single customer with multiple electric meters, located within the service area of the same retail electricity provider. Various buildings owned by municipalities, including water and wastewater districts, fire districts, villages, school districts, and towns, may constitute a group net metering system. A union or district school facility may be considered in the same group net metering system with buildings of its member schools that are located within the service area of the same retail electricity provider.

“kW” means kilowatt or kilowatts (AC).

“kWh” means kW hour or hours.

“MW” means megawatt or megawatts (AC).

“MWH” means MW hour or hours.

“Net metering” means measuring the difference between the electricity supplied to a customer and the electricity fed back by the customer’s net metering system during the customer’s billing period:

using a single, non-demand meter or such other meter that would otherwise be applicable to the customer’s usage but for the use of net metering; or

if the system serves more than one customer, using multiple meters. The calculation shall be made by converting all meters to a non-demand, non-time-of-day meter, and equalizing them to the tariffed kWh rate.

“Net metering system” means a plant for generation of electricity that:

is of no more than 500 kW capacity;

operates in parallel with facilities of the electric distribution system;

is intended primarily to offset the customer’s own electricity requirements and does not primarily supply electricity to electric vehicle supply equipment, as defined in section 201 of this title, for the resale of electricity to the public by the kWh or for other retail sales to the public, including those based in whole or in part on a flat fee per charging session or a time-based fee for occupying a parking space while using electric vehicle supply equipment; and

employs a renewable energy source; or
(D) (i) employs a renewable energy source; or

is a qualified micro-combined heat and power system of 20 kW or fewer that meets the definition of combined heat and power in subsection 8015(b) of this title and uses any fuel source that meets air quality standards.

“New renewable energy” means renewable energy produced by a specific and identifiable plant coming into service after June 30, 2015.

Energy from within a system of generating plants that includes renewable energy shall not constitute new renewable energy, regardless of whether the system includes specific plants that came or come into service after June 30, 2015.

“New renewable energy” also may include the additional energy from an existing renewable energy plant retrofitted with advanced technologies or otherwise operated, modified, or expanded to increase the kWh output of the plant in excess of an historical baseline established by calculating the average output of that plant for the 10-year period that ended June 30, 2015. If the production of new renewable energy through changes in operations, modification, or expansion involves combustion of the resource, the system also must result in an incrementally higher level of energy conversion efficiency or significantly reduced emissions.

“Plant” means an independent technical facility that generates electricity from renewable energy. A group of facilities, such as wind turbines, shall be considered one plant if the group is part of the same project and uses common equipment and infrastructure such as roads, control facilities, and connections to the electric grid. Common ownership, contiguity in time of construction, and proximity of facilities to each other shall be relevant to determining whether a group of facilities is part of the same project.

“Plant capacity” means the rated electrical nameplate for a plant, except that, in the case of a solar energy plant, the term shall mean the aggregate AC nameplate capacity of all inverters used to convert the plant’s output to AC power.

“Plant owner” means a person who has the right to sell electricity generated by a plant.

“Renewable energy” means energy produced using a technology that relies on a resource that is being consumed at a harvest rate at or below its natural regeneration rate.

For purposes of this subdivision (21), methane gas and other flammable gases produced by the decay of sewage treatment plant wastes or landfill wastes and anaerobic digestion of agricultural products, byproducts, or wastes, or of food wastes shall be considered renewable energy resources, but no other form of solid waste, other than silvicultural waste, shall be considered renewable.

For purposes of this subdivision (21), no form of nuclear fuel shall be considered renewable.

The only portion of electricity produced by a system of generating resources that shall be considered renewable is that portion generated a technology that qualifies as renewable under this subdivision (21).

The Commission by rule may add technologies or technology categories to the definition of “renewable energy,” provided that technologies using the following fuels shall not be considered renewable energy supplies: coal, oil, propane, and natural gas.

In this chapter, renewable energy refers to either “existing renewable energy” or “new renewable energy.”

“Renewable pricing” shall mean an optional service provided or contracted for by an electric company:
(22) (A) “Renewable pricing” shall mean an optional service provided or contracted for by an electric company:

under which the company’s customers may voluntarily either:

purchase all or part of their electric energy from renewable sources as defined in this chapter; or

cause the purchase and retirement of tradeable renewable energy credits on the participating customer’s behalf; and

which increases the company’s reliance on renewable sources of energy beyond those the electric company would otherwise be required to provide under section 218c of this title.

Renewable pricing programs may include:

contribution-based programs in which participating customers can determine the amount of a contribution, monthly or otherwise, that will be deposited in a Commission-approved fund for new renewable energy project development;

energy-based programs in which customers may choose all or a discrete portion of their electric energy use to be supplied from renewable resources;

facility-based programs in which customers may subscribe to a share of the capacity or energy from specific new renewable energy resources.

“Retail electricity provider” or “provider” means a company engaged in the distribution or sale of electricity directly to the public.

“Standard Offer Facilitator” means an entity appointed by the Commission pursuant to subsection 8005a(a) of this title.

[Repealed.]

“Tradeable renewable energy credits” means all of the environmental attributes associated with a single unit of energy generated by a renewable energy source where:

those attributes are transferred or recorded separately from that unit of energy;

the party claiming ownership of the tradeable renewable energy credits has acquired the exclusive legal ownership of all, and not less than all, the environmental attributes associated with that unit of energy; and

exclusive legal ownership can be verified through an auditable contract path or pursuant to the system established or authorized by the Commission or any program for tracking and verification of the ownership of environmental attributes of energy legally recognized in any state and approved by the Commission.

“Vermont composite electric utility system” means the combined generation, transmission, and distribution resources along with the combined retail load requirements of the Vermont retail electricity providers.

“Energy transformation project” means an undertaking that provides energy-related goods or services but does not include or consist of the generation of electricity and that results in a net reduction in fossil fuel consumption by the customers of a retail electricity provider and in the emission of greenhouse gases attributable to that consumption. Examples of energy transformation projects may include home weatherization or other thermal energy efficiency measures; air source or geothermal heat pumps; high efficiency heating systems; increased use of biofuels; biomass heating systems; support for transportation demand management strategies; support for electric vehicles or related infrastructure; and infrastructure for the storage of renewable energy on the electric grid.

“RES” means the Renewable Energy Standard established under sections 8004 and 8005 of this title.

“Energy storage facility” has the same meaning as in section 201 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 69

, § 1, eff. June 17, 2003; amended

2005, No. 61

, § 2;

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2009, No. 45

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2009;

2009, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. July 1, 2012;

2011, No. 47

, § 7, eff. May 25, 2011 and § 18;

2011, No. 125

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2011, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 18, 2012 and § 10;

2013, No. 89

, § 14;

2013, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2015, No. 56

, § 25;

2017, No. 53

, § 11;

2019, No. 59

, § 33, eff. June 14, 2019;

2019, No. 81

, § 4;

2021, No. 54

, § 10.

§ 8003.
Renewable energy pricing.

An electric utility, municipal department formed under local charter or chapter 79 of this title, or electric cooperative formed under chapter 81 of this title may implement a renewable energy pricing program under this section for its customers, or offer customers the option of making a voluntary contribution to the Vermont Clean Energy Development Fund established under section 8015 of this title. Such renewable energy pricing programs may include tariffs, standard special contracts, or other arrangements whose purpose is to increase the company’s reliance on, or the customer’s support of, renewable sources of energy or the type and quantity of renewable energy resources available.

A standard special contract for renewable pricing that has been approved as to form and substance by the Commission under this section shall not require further approval by the Commission under section 229 of this title as to individual customers who choose to execute that contract.

Renewable pricing programs may be priced in the form of a premium relative to the tariff that would otherwise apply; provided the premium shall be cost-based, shall reasonably reflect the difference between acquiring the renewable energy and the utility’s alternative cost of power, including administrative costs, and shall be adjusted via such periodic adjustment mechanisms, including adjustment clauses, as the Commission shall approve as part of a renewable pricing program. Any renewable pricing program shall require that any costs of power in excess of the company’s alternative cost of power shall be borne solely by those customers who elect to participate in the renewable pricing program.

Tradeable renewable energy credits (with or without other features), tradeable emissions credits, emission offsets, or other market instruments created or obtained by energy resources acquired pursuant to or as part of a renewable pricing program approved under this section shall be permanently retired by or on behalf of the program’s subscribers, and shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of. However, if a program is not fully subscribed, any such instruments created or obtained by the unsubscribed portion of the program may be sold or disposed of at no less than market value if the net proceeds of such sale or disposal are used to reduce the cost paid under the renewable pricing program.

The Commission shall ensure that disclosures and representations made regarding renewable pricing programs are accurate, are reasonably supported by objective data, disclose the types of technologies used, whether the energy is Vermont-based or not, and clearly distinguish between energy or tradeable energy credits provided from renewable and nonrenewable sources, and existing and new sources.

[Repealed.]

The Commission shall consider the following factors in deciding whether and upon what conditions to approve a proposed renewable energy pricing program:

minimization of marketing and administrative expenses;

auditing or certification of sources of energy or tradeable renewable energy credits;

marketing and promotion plans;

effectiveness of the program in meeting the goals of promoting renewable energy generation and public understanding of renewable energy sources in Vermont;

retention by the program of renewable energy production incentives, tax incentives, and other incentives earned or otherwise obtained by energy resources acquired pursuant to or as part of a renewable energy pricing program approved under this section to reduce the cost of any premiums paid under this section; and

costs imposed on nonparticipating customers arising on account of the implementation of the voluntary renewable energy pricing program.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 69

, § 1, eff. June 17, 2003; amended

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2009, No. 45

, § 4a, eff. May 27, 2009.

§ 8004.
Sales of electric energy; Renewable Energy Standard (RES).

Establishment; requirements. The RES is established. Under this program, a retail electricity provider shall not sell or otherwise provide or offer to sell or provide electricity in the State of Vermont without ownership of sufficient energy produced by renewable energy plants or sufficient tradeable renewable energy credits from plants whose energy is capable of delivery in New England that reflect the required amounts of renewable energy set forth in section 8005 of this title or without support of energy transformation projects in accordance with that section. A retail electricity provider may meet the required amounts of renewable energy through eligible tradeable renewable energy credits that it owns and retires, eligible renewable energy resources with environmental attributes still attached, or a combination of those credits and resources.

Rules. The Commission shall adopt the rules that are necessary to allow the Commission and the Department to implement and supervise further the implementation and maintenance of the RES.

RECS; banking. The Commission shall allow a provider that has met the required amount of renewable energy in a given year, commencing with 2017, to retain tradeable renewable energy credits created or purchased in excess of that amount for application to the provider’s required amount of renewable energy in one of the following three years.

Alternative compliance payment. In lieu of purchasing renewable energy or tradeable renewable energy credits or supporting energy transformation projects to satisfy the requirements of this section and section 8005 of this title, a retail electricity provider in this State may pay to the Vermont Clean Energy Development Fund established under section 8015 of this title an alternative compliance payment at the applicable rate set forth in section 8005.

VPPSA members. In the case of members of the Vermont Public Power Supply Authority, the requirements of this chapter may be met in the aggregate.

Joint efforts. Retail electricity providers may engage in joint efforts to meet one or more categories within the RES.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 69

, § 1, eff. June 17, 2003; amended

2005, No. 61

, § 3;

2005, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

2009, No. 45

, § 3, eff. May 27, 2009;

2011, No. 47

, §§ 18, 20m(a);

2015, No. 56

, § 2.

§ 8005.
RES categories.

Categories. This section specifies three categories of required resources to meet the requirements of the RES established in section 8004 of this title: total renewable energy, distributed renewable generation, and energy transformation.

Total renewable energy.

Purpose; establishment. To encourage the economic and environmental benefits of renewable energy, this subdivision establishes, for the RES, minimum total amounts of renewable energy within the supply portfolio of each retail electricity provider. To satisfy this requirement, a provider may use renewable energy with environmental attributes attached or any class of tradeable renewable energy credits generated by any renewable energy plant whose energy is capable of delivery in New England.

Required amounts. The amounts of total renewable energy required by this subsection shall be 55 percent of each retail electricity provider’s annual retail electric sales during the year beginning on January 1, 2017, increasing by an additional four percent each third January 1 thereafter, until reaching 75 percent on and after January 1, 2032.

Relationship to other categories. Distributed renewable generation used to meet the requirements of subdivision (2) of this subsection (a) shall also count toward the requirements of this subdivision. However, an energy transformation project under subdivision (3) of this subsection shall not count toward the requirements of this subdivision.

Municipal providers; petition. On petition by a provider that is a municipal electric utility serving not more than 6,000 customers, the Commission may reduce the provider’s required amount under this subdivision (1) for a period of up to three years. The Commission may approve one such period only for a municipal provider. The Commission may reduce this required amount if it finds that:

the terms or conditions of an environmental permit or certification necessitate a reduction in the electrical energy generated by an in-state hydroelectric facility that the provider owns and that this reduction will require the provider to purchase other renewable energy with environmental attributes attached or tradeable renewable energy credits in order to meet this required amount; and

this purchase will:

cause the provider to increase significantly its retail rates; or

materially impair the provider’s ability to meet the public’s need for energy services after safety concerns are addressed, in the manner set forth in subdivision 218c(a)(1) (least-cost integrated planning) of this title.

Distributed renewable generation.

Purpose; establishment. This subdivision establishes a distributed renewable generation category for the RES. This category encourages the use of distributed generation to support the reliability of the State’s electric system; reduce line losses; contribute to avoiding or deferring improvements to that system necessitated by transmission or distribution constraints; and diversify the size and type of resources connected to that system. This category requires the use of renewable energy for these purposes to reduce environmental and health impacts from air emissions that would result from using other forms of generation.

Definition. As used in this section, “distributed renewable generation” means one of the following:

a renewable energy plant that is new renewable energy; has a plant capacity of five MW or less; and

is directly connected to the subtransmission or distribution system of a Vermont retail electricity provider; or

is directly connected to the transmission system of an electric company required to submit a Transmission System Plan under subsection 218c(d) of this title, if the plant is part of a plan approved by the Commission to avoid or defer a transmission system improvement needed to address a transmission system reliability deficiency identified and analyzed in that Plan; or

a net metering system approved under the former section 219a or under section 8010 of this title if the system is new renewable energy and the interconnecting retail electricity provider owns and retires the system’s environmental attributes.

Required amounts. The required amounts of distributed renewable generation shall be one percent of each retail electricity provider’s annual retail electric sales during the year beginning January 1, 2017, increasing by an additional three-fifths of a percent each subsequent January 1 until reaching 10 percent on and after January 1, 2032.

Distributed generation greater than five MW. On petition of a retail electricity provider, the Commission may for a given year allow the provider to employ energy with environmental attributes attached or tradeable renewable energy credits from a renewable energy plant with a plant capacity greater than five MW to satisfy the distributed renewable generation requirement if the plant would qualify as distributed renewable generation but for its plant capacity and the provider demonstrates that it is unable during that year to meet the requirement solely with qualifying renewable energy plants of five MW or less. To demonstrate this inability, the provider shall issue one or more requests for proposals, and show that it is unable to obtain sufficient ownership of environmental attributes to meet its required amount under this subdivision (2) from:

the construction and interconnection to its system of distributed renewable generation that is consistent with its approved least-cost integrated resource plan under section 218c of this title at a cost less than or equal to the sum of the applicable alternative compliance payment rate and the applicable rates published by the Department under the Commission’s rules implementing subdivision 209(a)(8) of this title; and

purchase of tradeable renewable energy credits for distributed renewable generation at a cost that is less than the applicable alternative compliance rate.

Energy transformation.

Purpose; establishment. This subdivision establishes an energy transformation category for the RES. This category encourages Vermont retail electricity providers to support additional distributed renewable generation or to support other projects to reduce fossil fuel consumed by their customers and the emission of greenhouse gases attributable to that consumption. A retail electricity provider may satisfy the energy transformation requirement through distributed renewable generation in addition to the generation used to satisfy subdivision (2) of this subsection (a) or energy transformation projects or a combination of such generation and projects.

Required amounts. For the energy transformation category, the required amounts shall be two percent of each retail electricity provider’s annual retail electric sales during the year beginning January 1, 2017, increasing by an additional two-thirds of a percent each subsequent January 1 until reaching 12 percent on and after January 1, 2032. However, in the case of a provider that is a municipal electric utility serving not more than 6,000 customers, the required amount shall be two percent of the provider’s annual retail sales beginning on January 1, 2019, increasing by an additional two-thirds of a percent each subsequent January 1 until reaching 10 and two-thirds percent on and after January 1, 2032. Prior to January 1, 2019, such a municipal electric utility voluntarily may engage in one or more energy transformation projects in accordance with this subdivision (3).

Eligibility criteria. For an energy transformation project to be eligible under this subdivision (a)(3), each of the following shall apply:

Implementation of the project shall have commenced on or after January 1, 2015.

Over its life, the project shall result in a net reduction in fossil fuel consumed by the provider’s customers and in the emission of greenhouse gases attributable to that consumption, whether or not the fuel is supplied by the provider.

The project shall meet the need for its goods or services at the lowest present value life cycle cost, including environmental and economic costs. Evaluation of whether this subdivision (iii) is met shall include analysis of alternatives that do not increase electricity consumption.

The project shall cost the utility less per MWH than the applicable alternative compliance payment rate.

Conversion. For the purpose of determining eligibility and the application of the energy transformation project to a provider’s annual requirement, the provider shall convert the net reduction in fossil fuel consumption resulting from the energy transformation project to a MWH equivalent of electric energy, in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission. The conversion shall use the most recent year’s approximate heat rate for electricity net generation from the total fossil fuels category as reported by the U.S. Energy Information Administration in its Monthly Energy Review. If an energy transformation project is funded by more than one regulated entity, the Commission shall prorate the reduction in fossil fuel consumption among the regulated entities. In this subdivision (D), “regulated entity” includes each provider and each efficiency entity appointed under subsection 209(d) of this title.

Other sources.

A retail electricity provider or a provider’s partner may oversee an energy transformation project under this subdivision (3). However, the provider shall deliver the project’s goods or services in partnership with persons other than the provider unless exclusive delivery through the provider is more cost-effective than delivery by another person or there is no person other than the provider with the expertise or capability to deliver the goods or services.

An energy transformation project may provide incremental support to a program authorized under Vermont statute that meets the eligibility criteria of this subdivision (3) but may take credit only for the additional amount of service supported and shall not take credit for that program’s regularly budgeted or approved investments.

To meet the requirements of this subdivision (3), one or more retail electricity providers may jointly propose with an energy efficiency entity appointed under subdivision 209(d)(2) of this title an energy transformation project or group of such projects. The proposal shall include standards of measuring performance and methods to allocate savings and reductions in fossil fuel consumption and greenhouse gas emissions among each participating provider and efficiency entity.

Implementation. To carry out this subdivision (3), the Commission shall adopt rules:

For the conversion methodology in accordance with subdivision (3)(D) of this subsection (a).

To provide a process for prior approval of energy transformation projects by the Commission or its designee. This process shall ensure that each of these projects meets the requirements of this subdivision (3) and need not consist of individual review of each energy transformation project prior to implementation as long as the mechanism ensures those requirements are met. An energy transformation project that commenced prior to initial adoption of rules under this subdivision (F) may seek approval after such adoption.

For cost-effectiveness screening of energy transformation projects. This screening shall be consistent with the provisions of this subdivision (3) and, as applicable, the screening tests developed under subsections 209(d) (energy efficiency) and 218c(a) (least-cost integrated planning) of this title.

To allow a provider who has met its required amount under this subdivision (3) in a given year to apply excess net reduction in fossil fuel consumption, expressed as a MWH equivalent, from its energy transformation project or projects during that year toward the provider’s required amount in a future year.

To ensure periodic evaluation of an energy transformation project’s claimed fossil fuel reductions, avoided greenhouse gas emissions, conversion to MWH equivalent, cost-effectiveness and, if applicable, energy savings, and to ensure annual verification and auditing of a provider’s claims regarding project completion and resulting MWH equivalent. Changes to project claims resulting from periodic evaluations shall not reduce retroactively claims made on behalf of a project approved under subdivision (3)(F)(ii) of this subsection (a) or reduce verified claims carried forward under subdivision (3)(F)(iv) of this subsection (a).

To ensure that all ratepayers have an equitable opportunity to participate in, and benefit from, energy transformation projects regardless of rate class, income level, or provider service territory.

To ensure the coordinated delivery of energy transformation projects with the delivery of similar services, including low-income weatherization programs, entities that fund and support affordable housing, energy efficiency programs delivered under section 209 of this title, and other energy efficiency programs delivered locally or regionally within the State.

To ensure that, if an energy transformation project will increase the use of electric energy, the project incorporates best practices for demand management, uses technologies appropriate for Vermont, and encourages the installation of the technologies in buildings that meet minimum energy performance standards.

To provide a process under which a provider may withdraw from or terminate, in an orderly manner, an ongoing energy transformation project that no longer meets the eligibility criteria because of one or more factors beyond the control of the project and the provider.

Petitions. On petition of a retail electricity provider in any given year, the Commission may:

reduce the provider’s required amount under this subdivision (3) for that year, without penalty or alternative compliance payment, if the Commission finds that compliance with the required amount for that year will:

cause the provider to increase significantly its retail rates; or

materially impair the provider’s ability to meet the public’s need for energy services after safety concerns are addressed, in the manner set forth in subdivision 218c(a)(1) (least-cost integrated planning) of this title; or

allow a provider who failed to achieve the required amount under this subdivision (3) during the preceding year to avoid paying the alternative compliance payment if the Commission:

finds that the provider made a good faith effort to achieve the required amount and its failure to achieve that amount resulted from market factors beyond its control; and

directs that the provider add the difference between the required amount and the provider’s actually achieved amount for that year to its required amount for one or more future years.

Alternative compliance rates.

The alternative compliance payment rates for the categories established by this subsection (a) shall be:

total renewable energy requirement — $0.01 per kWh; and

distributed renewable generation and energy transformation requirements — $0.06 per kWh.

The Commission shall adjust these rates for inflation annually commencing January 1, 2018, using the CPI.

Reduced amounts; providers; 100 percent renewable.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply to a retail electricity provider that:

as of January 1, 2015, was entitled, through contract, ownership of energy produced by its own generation plants, or both, to an amount of renewable energy equal to or more than 100 percent of its anticipated total retail electric sales in 2017, regardless of whether the provider owned the environmental attributes of that renewable energy; and

annually each July 1 commencing in 2018, owns and has retired tradeable renewable energy credits monitored and traded on the New England Generation Information System or otherwise approved by the Commission equivalent to 100 percent of the provider’s total retail sales of electricity for the previous calendar year.

A provider meeting the requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection may:

satisfy the distributed renewable generation requirement of this section by accepting net metering systems within its service territory pursuant to the provisions of this title that govern net metering; and

if the Commission has appointed the provider as an energy efficiency entity under subsection 209(d) of this title, propose to the Commission to reduce the energy transformation requirement that would otherwise apply to the provider under this section.

The provider may make and the Commission may review such a proposal in connection with a periodic submission made by the provider pursuant to its appointment under subsection 209(d) of this title.

The Commission may approve a proposal under this subdivision (B) if it finds that:

the energy transformation requirement that would otherwise apply under this section exceeds the achievable potential for cost-effective energy transformation projects in the provider’s service territory that meet the eligibility criteria for these projects under this section; and

the reduced energy transformation requirement proposed by the provider is not less than the amount sufficient to ensure the provider’s deployment or support of energy transformation projects that will acquire that achievable potential.

The measure of cost-effectiveness under this subdivision (B) shall be the alternative compliance payment rate established in this section for the energy transformation requirement.

Biomass.

Distributed renewable generation that employs biomass to produce electricity shall be eligible to count toward a provider’s distributed renewable generation or energy transformation requirement only if the plant produces both electricity and thermal energy from the same biomass fuel and the majority of the energy recovered from the plant is thermal energy.

Distributed renewable generation and energy transformation projects that employ forest biomass to produce energy shall comply with renewability standards adopted by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation under

10 V.S.A. § 2751

.

Hydropower. A hydroelectric renewable energy plant shall be eligible to satisfy the distributed renewable generation or energy transformation requirement only if, in addition to meeting the definition of distributed renewable generation, the plant:

is and continues to be certified by the Low-impact Hydropower Institute; or

after January 1, 1987, received a water quality certification pursuant to 33 U.S.C. § 1341 from the Agency of Natural Resources.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 61

, § 4; amended

2005, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2009, No. 45

, § 4, eff. May 27, 2009;

2009, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 4, 5, 8, eff. June 4, 2010;

2011, No. 47

, § 8 (eff. May 25, 2011) and § 18;

2011, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 18, 2012;

2013, No. 34

, § 19;

2015, No. 56

, § 3;

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.